Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.510

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Remedies—Applicability.

(1) The remedies provided in RCW 41.50.530 through 41.50.650 and 26.09.138 are in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other remedies provided by law to enforce a dissolution order against an obligor.

(2) The remedies provided in RCW 41.50.530 through 41.50.630 shall be the exclusive remedies enforceable against the department of retirement systems or the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030 to recover spousal maintenance pursuant to a dissolution, divorce, or legal separation order.

(3) RCW 41.50.530 through 41.50.650 and 26.09.138 apply to all dissolution orders incident to a decree of divorce, dissolution, or legal separation whether entered before or after July 1, 1987.

[ 1991 c 365 s 2; 1987 c 326 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.